Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 13. SPORTS, AMUSEMENTS, AND ENTERTAINMENT

SUBTITLE D. OTHER AMUSEMENTS AND ENTERTAINMENT

CHAPTER 2157. REGULATION OF MOTION PICTURE THEATERS

Sec. 2157.001. INTERPRETATION OF CONTRACTS. An agreement relating to the distribution of a film shown in any theater in this state or the licensing of a motion picture or film shown in any theater in this state is to be construed under state law.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2157.002. VENUE FOR CERTAIN SUITS. (a) Venue of a suit arising out of an agreement described by Section 2157.001 is in the county in which:

(1) the film was licensed to be shown; or

(2) the principal office of the exhibitor under the agreement is located.

(b) A provision of the agreement attempting to establish venue in a place other than as provided by Subsection (a) is void.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 2157.003. REPORTS ON THEATER ATTENDANCE. (a) A private or confidential investigator employed to determine the attendance at or the number of paid admissions for a motion picture theater performance shall furnish to the owner or general manager of the theater:

(1) a report of the investigator's findings on the day after the date of the determination; and

(2) a written copy of the investigator's findings or report not later than the third day after the date of the determination.

(b) If an investigator does not comply with Subsection (a), evidence obtained by the investigator and the investigator's testimony is not admissible as evidence in any court or other proceeding.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.